src/fst/test/gt-desc-yamls/V2-Oct_2016_gt-desc.yaml
     hoidma+V+Impers+Prt+Prc: hoitud
     hoidma+V+Impers+Prt+Ind+Neg: hoitud
     hoidma+V+Impers+Prt+Cond: hoituks
     hoidma+V+Impers+Prs+Prc: hoitav
     hoidma+V+Impers+Prs+Quot: hoitavat
     hoidma+V+Impers+Prs+Cond: hoitaks
     hoidma+V+Impers+Prs+Ind+Neg: hoita
     hoidma+V+Impers+Prs+Ind+Aff: hoitakse
     hoidma+V+Impers+Prs+Imprt: hoitagu
     hoidma+V+Impers+Sup: hoitama
     hoidma+V+Impers+Prt+Ind+Aff: hoiti
     hoidma+V+Pers+Prs+Ind+Sg2+Aff: hoiad
     hoidma+V+Pers+Prs+Cond: hoiaks
     hoidma+V+Pers+Prs+Cond+Pl3+Aff: hoiaksid
     hoidma+V+Pers+Prs+Cond+Pl2+Aff: hoiaksite
     hoidma+V+Pers+Prs+Cond+Pl1+Aff: hoiaksime
     hoidma+V+Pers+Prs+Cond+Sg2+Aff: hoiaksid
     hoidma+V+Pers+Prs+Cond+Sg1+Aff: hoiaksin
     hoidma+V+Pers+Prs+Ind+Sg1+Aff: hoian
     hoidma+V+Pers+Prs+Ind+Pl1+Aff: hoiame
     hoidma+V+Pers+Prs+Ind+Pl2+Aff: hoiate
     hoidma+V+Pers+Prs+Ind+Pl3+Aff: hoiavad
     hoidma+V+Pers+Prs+Ind+Sg3+Aff: hoiab
     hoidma+V+Pers+Prs+Imprt+Sg2: hoia
     hoidma+V+Pers+Prs+Ind+Neg: hoia
     ütlema+V+Inf: öelda
     ütlema+V+Ger: öeldes
     ütlema+V+Pers+Prs+Imprt: öelgu
     ütlema+V+Pers+Prs+Imprt+Pl2: öelge
     ütlema+V+Pers+Prs+Imprt+Pl1: öelgem
     ütlema+V+Pers+Prt+Quot: öelnuvat
     ütlema+V+Pers+Prt+Prc: öelnud
     ütlema+V+Pers+Prt+Ind+Neg: öelnud
     ütlema+V+Pers+Prt+Cond: öelnuks
     ütlema+V+Pers+Prt+Cond+Pl3+Aff: öelnuksid
     ütlema+V+Pers+Prt+Cond+Pl2+Aff: öelnuksite
     ütlema+V+Pers+Prt+Cond+Pl1+Aff: öelnuksime
     ütlema+V+Pers+Prt+Cond+Sg2+Aff: öelnuksid
     ütlema+V+Pers+Prt+Cond+Sg1+Aff: öelnuksin
     ütlema+V+Impers+Prt+Prc: öeldud
     ütlema+V+Impers+Prt+Ind+Neg: öeldud
     ütlema+V+Impers+Prt+Cond: öelduks
     ütlema+V+Impers+Prs+Prc: öeldav
     ütlema+V+Impers+Prs+Quot: öeldavat
     ütlema+V+Impers+Prs+Cond: öeldaks
     ütlema+V+Impers+Prs+Ind+Neg: öelda
     ütlema+V+Impers+Prs+Ind+Aff: öeldakse
     ütlema+V+Impers+Prs+Imprt: öeldagu
     ütlema+V+Impers+Sup: öeldama
     ütlema+V+Impers+Prt+Ind+Aff: öeldi
